Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 83-1201 to 83-1226 shall be known and may be cited as the Developmental Disabilities Services Act.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1136, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 852, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB895, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1039, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB333, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB793, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB376, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 34.
July 18, 2026